Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.080

Parking facilities—Construction, operation and rental charges.

Counties may construct, maintain, operate and collect rentals for parking facilities as a part of a courthouse or combined county-city building facility.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 8 s 1.]

NOTES:

Revenue bonds for parking facilities: RCW 36.67.520.